Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 4

Remote Contractor/Remote Contractor Payment

66-34-401. Payment by remote contractor to remote contractor.

A remote contractor contracting in writing with another remote contractor for the improvement of real property shall make payment to the other remote contractor in accordance with part 3 of this chapter.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 27.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “remote contractor” for “subcontractor, materialman or furnisher” three times.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.